Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-110
Marriage certificate; provided to parties; form.

Whenever a marriage shall have been solemnized pursuant to the provisions of sections 42-101 to 42-117, the minister or magistrate who solemnized the same shall give to each of the parties, on request, a certificate under his hand, specifying the names, ages and places of residence of the parties married, the names and residences of at least two witnesses who were present at such marriage, and the time and place thereof.

R.S.1866, c. 34, § 10, p. 255;

R.S.1913, § 1549;

C.S.1922, § 1498;

C.S.1929, § 42-110;

R.S.1943, § 42-110.